District of Columbia statutes.
42-3171.01

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter the term:

(1)

“Abandoned property” means:

(A)

A structure:

(i)

That is unoccupied by an owner or a tenant; and

(ii)

On which the real property tax imposed by § 47-811 has not been paid in 18 months;

(B)

A vacant lot on which the real property tax imposed by § 47-811 has not been paid in 18 months;

(C)

A structure:

(i)

That is unoccupied by an owner or tenant;

(ii)

That the Mayor has determined is structurally unsafe; and

(iii)

Regarding which the Mayor has issued to the owner a notice requiring that the owner cause the structure to conform with any provision of the fire code, building code, or housing code, or to demolish the structure for safety reasons, and the owner has failed to act in response to the Mayor’s notice within the period of time established by statute, regulation, or the notice; or

(D)

A vacant lot on which a building has been demolished.

(1A)

“Blighted Area” shall have the meaning as set forth in § 2-1219.01(6) [repealed].

(2)

“Deteriorated property” means real property:

(A)

The Mayor has determined constitutes a threat to the public health, safety, or welfare;

(B)

The Mayor has determined contributes to the blight or dilapidation of the area immediately surrounding the property; or

(C)

As to which, if the real property contains a structure, the Mayor has issued to the owner a notice requiring the owner to conform the structure to any provision of the fire code, building code, or housing code, or to demolish the structure for safety reasons, and the owner has failed to act in response to the Mayor’s notice within the period of time established by statute, regulation, or the notice.

(3)

“Owner” means a person who holds legal title to an interest in real property as reflected in the records of the Recorder of Deeds.

(4)

“Slum and blight” means one or more parcels of land, whether vacant or improved that are in a blighted area, or exhibit one or more characteristics of a blighted area.

(5)

“Tenant” shall have the meaning set forth in § 42-3501.03(36).

History

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-281, § 431
as added Apr. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-114, § 102, 49 DCR 1468
Oct. 1, 2002, D.C. Law 14-190, § 1002(a), 49 DCR 6968
Oct. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-213, § 29(a), 49 DCR 8140
June 8, 2006, D.C. Law 16-119, § 2, 53 DCR 2609
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, §§ 115, 182, 56 DCR 1117

Section References

This section is referenced in § 10-831.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 14-190 made nonsubstantive changes in par. (2)(B).
D.C. Law 14-213, in par. (4), validated a previously made technical correction.
D.C. Law 16-119 added par. (1A); and rewrote par. (4), which had read as follows: “(4) ‘Slum and blight’ means properties in a blighted area, as that term is defined in § 2-1219.01(6).”
D.C. Law 17-353 validated previously made technical corrections in pars. (1A), (2)(C), and (4).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1002(a) of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-453, July 23, 2002, 49 DCR 8026).

Short Title

Short title of title X of Law 14-190: Section 1001 of D.C. Law 14-190 provided that title X of the act may be cited as the Quick Acquisition of Abandoned and Nuisance Property Amendment Act of 2002.

Delegation of Authority

Delegation of Authority Under D.C. Law 13-281, the “Abatement and Condemnation of Nuisance Property Omnibus Amendment Act of 2002”, see Mayor’s Order 2002-33, March 1, 2002 ( 49 DCR 1875).
Delegation of Authority to the Director of the Department of Housing and Community Development, see Mayor’s Order 2007-209, September 27, 2007 ( 55 DCR 133).

Editor's Notes

Section 1101 of D.C. Law 14-114 provided: “The Mayor, pursuant to Title I of the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure Act, approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; D.C. Official Code § 2-501 et seq.), shall promulgate rules to implement this act.”